Utah statutes.
53-10-114.   Authority regarding drug precursors.

(1)  As used in this section, "acts" means:

(a)  Title 58, Chapter 37c, Utah Controlled Substance Precursor Act; and

(b)  Title 58, Chapter 37d, Clandestine Drug Lab Act.

(2)  The division has authority to enforce the drug lab and precursor acts.  To carry out this purpose, the division may:

(a)  inspect, copy, and audit any records, inventories of controlled substance precursors, and reports required under the acts and rules adopted under the acts;

(b)  enter the premises of regulated distributors and regulated purchasers during normal business hours to conduct administrative inspections;

(c)  assist the law enforcement agencies of the state in enforcing the acts;

(d)  conduct investigations to enforce the acts;

(e)  present evidence obtained from investigations conducted in conjunction with appropriate county and district attorneys and the Office of the Attorney General for civil or criminal prosecution or for administrative action against a licensee; and

(f)  work in cooperation with the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing, created under Section 58-1-103, to accomplish the purposes of this section.



Enacted by Chapter 101, 1998 General Session

